Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1239
Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 43-1241, a court of this state which has made a child custody determination consistent with section 43-1238 or 43-1240 has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over the determination until:

(1) a court of this state determines that neither the child, nor the child and one parent, nor the child and a person acting as a parent have a significant connection with this state and that substantial evidence is no longer available in this state concerning the child's care, protection, training, and personal relationships; or

(2) a court of this state or a court of another state determines that the child, the child's parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in this state.

(b) A court of this state which has made a child custody determination and does not have exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify that determination only if it has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under section 43-1238.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 14.

Subsection (a) of this section provides the rules for continuing jurisdiction under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. Watson v. Watson, 272 Neb. 647, 724 N.W.2d 24 (2006).

Under subsection (a)(1) of this section, whether a court's exclusive and continuing jurisdiction has been lost is a determination to be made by a court of this state. Watson v. Watson, 272 Neb. 647, 724 N.W.2d 24 (2006).

When North Dakota made the initial child custody determination concerning a child in the parents' divorce, exclusive and continuing jurisdiction remained with that court under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, either until a determination was made under subsection (a) of this section or until the court declined to exercise jurisdiction under section 43-1244 on the basis of being an inconvenient forum. In re Interest of Kirsten H., 25 Neb. App. 909, 915 N.W.2d 815 (2018).

Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction remains with the district court under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act either until jurisdiction is lost under subsection (a) of this section or until the court declines to exercise jurisdiction under section 43-1244 on the basis of being an inconvenient forum. Floerchinger v. Floerchinger, 24 Neb. App. 120, 883 N.W.2d 419 (2016).

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act lists evidence concerning the child's care, protection, training, and personal relationships as relevant evidence regarding custody. Floerchinger v. Floerchinger, 24 Neb. App. 120, 883 N.W.2d 419 (2016).